Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2056
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the market for hospital and health care services is becoming increasingly competitive, that hospitals and other health care providers are contracting to engage in economic joint ventures to form partnerships to offer integrated health care services to the public, and that this increasing competition is forcing hospitals and other health care providers to develop market strategies and strategic plans to effectively compete. The purpose of sections 71-2056 to 71-2061 is to enhance the ability of public hospitals to compete effectively and equally in the market for health care services.

Laws 1985, LB 61, § 1.